Arkansas, session 2025, HB1788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-411(a)(2)(A), concerning the number
of days a healthcare insurer is provided to make a decision on an application
of a provider under the Arkansas Health Care Consumer Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(2)(A) Healthcare insurers A healthcare insurer shall make a
decision within:
(i) Sixty (60) calendar days from the date of
submission of a completed application as defined by rule of the Insurance
Commissioner for participation or a request for renewal by a physician
licensed under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-
95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq.; and
(ii) One hundred eighty (180) ninety (90) calendar
days from the date of submission of a completed application as defined by
rule of the commissioner for participation or a request for renewal by any
other provider.
*ANS333*
03-20-2025 10:24:00 ANS333

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 HB1788

/s/L. Johnson


































03-20-2025 10:24:00 ANS333